California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(3) The department shall calculate for each nondesignated public hospital the charity care charges as a percentage of the hospital’s total gross revenue. If the charity care charges are greater than or equal to 3 percent of the total gross revenue, the hospital
 shall score three points. If the charity care charges are less than 3 percent, but more than or equal to 1 percent, of the total gross revenue, the hospital shall score two points. If the charity care charges are less than 1 percent, but greater than 0 percent, of the total gross revenue, the hospital shall score one point. If charity care charges are less than or equal to 0 percent, of the total gross revenue, the hospital shall score zero points.

(4) The department shall calculate for each nondesignated public hospital the bad debt charges as a percentage of the hospital’s other payer’s gross revenue, as disclosed in the Hospital Annual Financial Disclosure Report. If the bad debt charges are greater than or equal to 40 percent of the other gross revenue, the hospital shall score two points. If the bad debt charges are less than 40 percent, but greater than 0 percent, of the other gross revenue, the hospital shall score one point. If the bad
 debt charges are less than or equal to 0 percent, of the other gross revenue, the hospital shall score zero points.

(5) The department shall calculate for each nondesignated public hospital the Medi-Cal charges as a percentage of the hospital’s total gross revenue. If the Medi-Cal charges are greater than or equal to 25 percent of the total gross revenue, the hospital shall score three points. If the Medi-Cal charges are less than 25 percent, but more than or equal to 12 percent, of the total gross revenue, the hospital shall score two points. If the Medi-Cal charges are less than 12 percent, but greater than 0 percent, of the total gross revenue, the hospital shall score one point. If the Medi-Cal charges are less than or equal to 0 percent of total gross revenue, the hospital shall score zero points.

(6) The sum of each nondesignated public hospital’s points accumulated pursuant
 to paragraphs (2) to (5), inclusive, shall constitute the hospital’s IGT Formula Score. The IGT Formula Score for a new hospital or a converted hospital shall be equal to zero.

(7) The Contract Hospital allocation shall be allocated among Contract Hospitals and the Non-Contract Hospital allocation shall be allocated among Non-Contract Hospitals to determine preliminary allocations in accordance with the following:

(A) Each Contract Hospital that has an IGT Formula Score of between seven and nine, inclusive, shall be allocated three times the amount of the Contract Hospital allocation that is allocated to each Contract Hospital that has a score of one to three, inclusive.

(B) Each Contract Hospital that has an IGT Formula Score of between four and six, inclusive, shall be allocated two times the amount of the Contract
 Hospital allocation that is allocated to each Contract Hospital that has an IGT Formula Score of one to three, inclusive.

(C) Each Non-Contract Hospital that has an IGT Formula Score of between seven and nine, inclusive, shall be allocated three times the amount of the Non-Contract Hospital allocation that is allocated to each Non-Contract Hospital that has an IGT Formula Score of one to three, inclusive.

(D) Each Non-Contract Hospital that has an IGT Formula Score of between four and six, inclusive, shall be allocated two times the amount of the Non-Contract Hospital allocation that is allocated to each Non-Contract Hospital that has an IGT Formula Score of one to three, inclusive.

(E) No amount shall be allocated to a nondesignated public hospital with an IGT Formula Score of zero points.

(8) The sum of the preliminary allocation determined under paragraph (7) for all hospitals within each IGT Formula Group shall be reallocated among the hospitals within each IGT Formula Group based on the ratio of each hospital’s staffed acute beds listed in the latest OSHPD Annual Financial Disclosure Report, to the total staffed acute beds of all hospitals in the IGT Formula Group.

(b) By no later than September 1 of the 2011–12 fiscal year or as soon thereafter as federal approvals are obtained, and by no later than September 1 of each fiscal year thereafter, the department shall provide each nondesignated public hospital with an estimated IGT allocation notice that includes the calculations and data sources used to calculate the estimated IGT allocation, as described in this section.

(c) Each nondesignated public
 hospital shall have 30 days from receipt of the estimated IGT allocation notice from the department to review the department’s hospital-specific estimated IGT allocation and to notify the department of any data or calculation errors. If the hospital does not respond within 30 days, the information will be deemed accurate. No later than November 30 of each fiscal year, the department shall incorporate all appropriate corrections or data updates for all of the nondesignated public hospitals and then recalculate the IGT allocations using the IGT allocation formula to obtain a final IGT allocation for each nondesignated public hospital.

(d) Beginning with the 2011–12 fiscal year, on or before December 1 or as soon thereafter as federal approvals are obtained, and by no later than December 1 of each fiscal year thereafter, the department shall send each nondesignated public hospital a notice of eligibility indicating the final IGT allocation for the
 nondesignated public hospital. The nondesignated public hospital shall have 20 business days after receipt of the notice to either accept or decline the offer. If a nondesignated public hospital accepts the offer, the nondesignated public hospital may enter into an IGT agreement with the department. If the department receives no response, the offer will be considered declined.

(e) Before the later of December 31 of the 2011–12 fiscal year, the date upon which all federal approvals are obtained, and by no later than January 15 of each state fiscal year thereafter, the department shall document all nondesignated public hospital IGT allocation offers that are either accepted or declined. After the department has recorded all IGT allocations as being either accepted or declined, any remaining unsubscribed IGT allocations will be allocated to all the other participating nondesignated public hospitals on a pro rata basis based on the final IGT
 allocations calculated pursuant to subdivision (b) during January of each fiscal year. The department shall inform each nondesignated public hospital participating in the program of the revised final IGT allocation assigned to that hospital by January 30. At that time, the department shall give each nondesignated public hospital participant five days to accept or decline participation in the program.

(f) The state may accept all public funds in the amount of the final IGT allocation from a transferring entity pursuant to this section, provided that any funds from a transferring entity must be permitted by law to be used for these purposes. The transferring entity shall certify to the department that the funds it proposes to transfer satisfy the requirements of this subdivision, and are in compliance with all federal rules and regulations.

(g) The state shall deposit the funds
 received from the transferring entities pursuant to this article into the Medi-Cal Inpatient Payment Adjustment Fund established in accordance with Section 14163.

(h) Nondesignated public hospitals participating in the program shall inform the public entity funding the IGT to transfer the appropriate IGT allocation, by February 5 of each fiscal year, to the state according to the time schedule specified in the written agreement specified in subdivision (d). By March 31 of each fiscal year, the department shall make the supplemental payment to the nondesignated public hospital including the associated federal financial participation. The deadlines set forth in this subdivision shall be implemented beginning with the 2011–12 fiscal year or as soon thereafter as federal approvals are obtained.

(i) The department shall establish written policies and procedures for transferring entity
 intergovernmental transfers and payments made to nondesignated public hospitals pursuant to this section. The department shall effectively communicate these policies and procedures to nondesignated public hospitals and the public entities that will be funding the IGTs in order to facilitate a smooth process using local public entity moneys for purposes of drawing down federal financial participation for supplemental payments to nondesignated public hospitals.

(j) (1) A nondesignated public hospital participating in the program, as a condition of receiving supplemental payment pursuant to this section, shall reimburse the department for the costs of administering this section.

(2) For each fiscal year up to and including the 2025–26 fiscal year, the state shall retain 9 percent of each IGT amount to reimburse the department, or transfer to the General Fund, for the administrative costs of operating the Nondesignated Public Hospital Intergovernmental Transfer Program and for the benefit of Medi-Cal children’s health care programs.

(3) (A) Beginning with the 2026–27 fiscal year and every fiscal year thereafter, the state shall retain a percentage of each IGT amount associated with interim supplemental payments such that the total amount retained is equal to the projected administrative cost to the department associated with implementing this section. The department shall project the administrative cost associated with implementing this section each fiscal year in order to determine the percentage of each IGT associated with interim supplemental payments to be retained. That calculation shall account for any excess funds remaining from a prior fiscal year.

(B) It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting the changes to this section made by the act that added this paragraph to provide the supplement payment described in this
 section without any expenditure from the General Fund, beginning with the 2026–27 fiscal year and every fiscal year thereafter.

(k) Participation in the intergovernmental transfers under this article is voluntary on the part of the transferring entities for the purpose of all applicable federal laws.

(l) (1) The department shall report annually to the Legislature on the Nondesignated Public Hospital Intergovernmental Transfer Program. This report shall include, but not be limited to, the amount of funds available within the UPL, the total amount of IGT allocation funds transferred by public entities, the total amount of federal financial participation received by nondesignated public hospitals, and information on the effectiveness of the IGT allocation formula to distribute available federal matching funds among participating
 nondesignated public hospitals.

(2) The requirement for submitting a report to the Legislature on the Nondesignated Public Hospital Intergovernmental Transfer Program imposed under paragraph (1) is inoperative four years after the date the first report is due.

(3) A report to be submitted pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(m) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department shall implement this article by means of policy letters or similar instructions, without taking further regulatory action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 21, Sec. 110.   (AB 116)   Effective June 30, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5.2. Medi-Cal Hospital Care/Uninsured Hospital Care Demonstration Project Act [14166. - 14166.26.]

14166.

(a) This article shall be known and may be cited as the “Medi-Cal Hospital/Uninsured Care Demonstration Project Act.”

(b) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(1) The preservation of the state’s disproportionate share hospitals and the University of California hospitals is of critical importance to the health and welfare of the people of the
 state.

(2) These hospitals, as well as many nondisproportionate district hospitals, are facing unprecedented financial challenges. Many are facing significant budget deficits impeding their ability to continue serving their essential role in the health care delivery system, including providing care to Medi-Cal beneficiaries and uninsured patients.

(3) The financial viability of these hospitals has been sustained through funding that has been available for California’s disproportionate share hospital program under Medi-Cal. Without these funds, many of these hospitals would be unable to keep their doors open and others would be forced to curtail services, thereby impacting service to Medi-Cal beneficiaries and other needy individuals.

(4) The federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services has indicated in
 negotiations with the State Department of Health Services that it is changing its approach to federal funding of Medicaid in various respects. For instance, the methodology that many states, including California, have used to fund their disproportionate share hospital programs successfully for more than a decade has become the subject of negative attention by the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, which is refusing to approve discretionary waivers and state plan amendments that rely on these funding methods. Accordingly, the State of California has proposed that the funding mechanism for inpatient hospital services under Medi-Cal be modified to secure federal approval and address continued and adequate funding to the University of California and disproportionate share hospitals. To this end, the state has negotiated a waiver from various federal Medicaid requirements that will allow it to implement a demonstration project using modified funding methodologies. The Medi-Cal Hospital/Uninsured
 Care Demonstration Project is intended to make up to $3.3 billion in additional federal funds available to California safety net hospitals over a five-year period.

(5) The methodologies used to fund the Medi-Cal program should maximize the use of federal funds consistent with federal Medicaid law in an effort to access all of the increased federal funding available under the Medi-Cal Hospital/Uninsured Care Demonstration Project.

(6) The amount of Medi-Cal funding to the University of California hospitals and disproportionate share hospitals as a whole should not be less than the amount of funding for the 2004-05 fiscal year. Similarly, the amount of Medi-Cal funding for the public disproportionate share hospitals as a group and for the private disproportionate share hospitals as a group should not be less than the amount of funding for the 2004-05 fiscal year.

(7) The distributions of Medi-Cal funds should provide a predictable and stable amount of funding for these hospitals in order to allow them to engage in short-term and long-term planning. The distribution methodologies should be fair and equitable, and take into account utilization changes among hospitals.

(8) The payments of Medi-Cal funds to these hospitals should be made regularly and periodically throughout the year in order to provide hospitals with necessary cashflow.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 560, Sec. 1.   Effective October 5, 2005.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in Section 14166.26 or in subd. (b) or (g) of Section 14166.2.   Repealed on date prescribed in Section 14166.26 or in subd. (b) or (g) of Section 14166.2.)
-------------------------------------------

14166.1.

For purposes of this article, the following definitions shall apply:

(a) “Allowable costs” means those costs recognized as allowable under Medicare reasonable cost principles and additional costs recognized under the demonstration project and successor demonstration project, including those expenditures identified in Appendix D to the Special Terms and Conditions for the demonstration project and successor demonstration project. Allowable costs under this subdivision shall be determined in accordance with the Special Terms and Conditions and implementation documents for the demonstration project and successor demonstration project approved by the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services.

(b) “Base year private DSH hospital” means a nonpublic hospital, nonpublic-converted hospital, or converted hospital, as those terms are defined in paragraphs (26), (27), and (28), respectively, of subdivision (a) of Section 14105.98, that was an eligible hospital under paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 14105.98 for the 2004–05 state fiscal year.

(c) “Demonstration project” means the Medi-Cal Hospital/Uninsured Care Demonstration, Number 11-W-00193/9, as approved by the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, effective for the period of September 1, 2005, through October 31, 2010.

(d) “Designated public hospital” means any one of the following hospitals to the extent identified in Attachment C, “Government-operated Hospitals to be Reimbursed on a Certified Public Expenditure Basis,” to the Special
 Terms and Conditions for the demonstration project and successor demonstration project, as applicable, issued by the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services:

(1) UC Davis Medical Center.

(2) UC Irvine Medical Center.

(3) UC San Diego Medical Center.

(4) UC San Francisco Medical Center.

(5) UC Los Angeles Medical Center, including Santa Monica/UCLA Medical Center.

(6) LA County Harbor/UCLA Medical Center.

(7) LA County Martin Luther King Jr.-Harbor Hospital.

(8) LA County Olive View UCLA
 Medical Center.

(9) LA County Rancho Los Amigos National Rehabilitation Center.

(10) LA County University of Southern California Medical Center.

(11) Alameda Health System.

(12) Arrowhead Regional Medical Center.

(13) Contra Costa Regional Medical Center.

(14) Kern Medical Center.

(15) Natividad Medical Center.

(16) Riverside County Regional Medical Center.

(17) San Francisco General Hospital.

(18) San Joaquin General Hospital.

(19) San Mateo Medical Center.

(20) Santa Clara Valley Medical Center.

(21) Tuolumne General Hospital.

(22) Ventura County Medical Center.

(e) “Federal medical assistance percentage” means the federal medical assistance percentage applicable for federal financial participation purposes for medical services under the Medi-Cal state plan pursuant to Section 1396b(a) of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(f) “Nondesignated public hospital” means a public hospital defined in paragraph (25) of subdivision (a) of Section 14105.98,
 excluding designated public hospitals.

(g) “Project year” means the applicable state fiscal year of the Medi-Cal Hospital/Uninsured Care Demonstration Project through October 31, 2010.

(h) “Project year private DSH hospital” means a nonpublic hospital, nonpublic-converted hospital, or converted hospital, as those terms are defined in paragraphs (26), (27), and (28), respectively, of subdivision (a) of Section 14105.98, that was an eligible hospital under paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 14105.98, for the particular project year.

(i) “Prior supplemental funds” means the Emergency Services and Supplemental Payments Fund, the Medi-Cal Medical Education Supplemental Payment Fund, the Large Teaching Emphasis Hospital and Children’s Hospital Medi-Cal Medical Education Supplemental Payment Fund, and the Small and
 Rural Hospital Supplemental Payments Fund, established under Sections 14085.6, 14085.7, 14085.8, and 14085.9, respectively.

(j) “Private hospital” means a nonpublic hospital, nonpublic-converted hospital, or converted hospital, as those terms are defined in paragraphs (26) to (28), inclusive, respectively, of subdivision (a) of Section 14105.98.

(k) “Safety net care pool” means the federal funds available under the Medi-Cal Hospital/Uninsured Care Demonstration Project and the successor demonstration project to ensure continued government support for the provision of health care services to uninsured populations.

(l) “Uninsured” shall have the same meaning as that term has in the Special Terms and Conditions issued by the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services for the demonstration project and the
 successor demonstration project.

(m) “Successor demonstration project” means the Medicaid demonstration project entitled “California’s Bridge to Reform,” No. 11-W-00193/9, as approved by the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, effective for the period of November 1, 2010, through October 31, 2015.

(n) “Successor demonstration year” means the demonstration year as identified in the Special Terms and Conditions for the successor demonstration project that corresponds to a specific period of time as follows:

(1) Successor demonstration year 6 corresponds to the period of November 1, 2010, through June 30, 2011.

(2) Successor demonstration year 7 corresponds to the period of July 1, 2011, through June 30, 2012.

(3) Successor demonstration year 8 corresponds to the period of July 1, 2012, through June 30, 2013.

(4) Successor demonstration year 9 corresponds to the period of July 1, 2013, through June 30, 2014.

(5) Successor demonstration year 10 corresponds to July 1, 2014, through October 31, 2015.

(o) “Low Income Health Program” means the county-based elective program to provide benefits for low-income individuals that is authorized by the successor demonstration project and implemented by Part 3.6 (commencing with Section 15909).

(p) “Delivery system reform incentive pool” means the separate federal funding pool created within the safety net care pool under the successor demonstration project that
 is available to support programs of activity to enhance the quality of care and health of patients served by designated public hospitals and nonhospital clinics and other provider types with which they are affiliated, and, under specified conditions and approval of the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, to private disproportionate share hospitals and nondesignated public hospitals.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 46, Sec. 5.   (SB 1352)   Effective January 1, 2015.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in Section 14166.26 or in subd. (b) or (g) of Section 14166.2.   Repealed on date prescribed in Section 14166.26 or in subd. (b) or (g) of Section 14166.2.)
-------------------------------------------

14166.2.

(a) The demonstration project, and the successor demonstration project, as applicable, shall be implemented and administered pursuant to this article.

(b) (1) The director may modify any process or methodology specified in this article to the extent necessary to comply with federal law or the terms of the
 demonstration project or the successor demonstration project, as applicable, but only if the modification results in the equitable distribution of funding, consistent with this article, among the hospitals affected by the modification. If the director, after consulting with affected hospitals, determines that an equitable distribution cannot be achieved, the director shall execute a declaration stating that this determination has been made. The director shall retain the declaration and provide a copy, within five working days of the execution of the declaration, to the fiscal and appropriate policy committees of the Legislature. This article shall become inoperative on the date that the director executes a declaration pursuant to this subdivision, and as of January 1 of the following year shall be repealed.

(2) In addition to the requirements specified in paragraph (1), the director shall post the declaration on the department’s Internet Web
 site and the director shall send the declaration to the Secretary of State and the Legislative Counsel.

(c) The director shall administer the demonstration project, the successor demonstration project, and related Medi-Cal payment programs in a manner that attempts to maximize available payment of federal financial participation, consistent with federal law, the applicable Special Terms and Conditions for the demonstration project and successor demonstration project issued by the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, and this article.

(d) As permitted by the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, this article shall be effective with regard to services rendered throughout the term of the demonstration project, and retroactively, with regard to services rendered on or after July 1, 2005, but prior to the implementation of the demonstration project, and
 with regard to services rendered throughout the term of the successor demonstration project.

(e) In the administration of this article, the state shall continue to make payments to hospitals that meet the eligibility requirements for participation in the supplemental reimbursement program for hospital facility construction, renovation, or replacement pursuant to Section 14085.5 and shall continue to make inpatient hospital payments not covered by the contract. These payments shall not duplicate any other payments made under this article.

(f) The department shall continue to operate the selective provider contracting program in accordance with Article 2.6 (commencing with Section 14081) in a manner consistent with this article. A designated public hospital participating in the certified public expenditure process shall maintain a selective provider contracting program contract.
 These contracts shall continue to be exempt from Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 10290) of Part 2 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code.

(g) (1) In the event of a final judicial determination made by any state or federal court that is not appealed in any action by any party or a final determination by the administrator of the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services that federal financial participation is not available with respect to any payment made under any of the methodologies implemented pursuant to this article because the methodology is invalid, unlawful, or is contrary to any provision of federal law or regulation, the director may modify the process or methodology to comply with law, but only if the modification results in the equitable distribution of demonstration project funding, consistent with this article, among the hospitals affected by the modification. If the director, after consulting
 with affected hospitals, determines that an equitable distribution cannot be achieved, the director shall execute a declaration stating that this determination has been made. The director shall retain the declaration and provide a copy, within five working days of the execution of the declaration, to the fiscal and appropriate policy committees of the Legislature. This article shall become inoperative on the date that the director executes a declaration pursuant to this subdivision, and as of January 1 of the following year shall be repealed.

(2) In addition to the requirements specified in paragraph (1), the director shall post the declaration on the department’s Internet Web site and the director shall send the declaration to the Secretary of State and the Legislative Counsel.

(h) (1) The department may adopt regulations to implement this article. These
 regulations may initially be adopted as emergency regulations in accordance with the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code). For purposes of this article, the adoption of regulations shall be deemed an emergency and necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety or general welfare. Any emergency regulations adopted pursuant to this section shall not remain in effect subsequent to 24 months after the effective date of this article.

(2) As an alternative, and notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, or any other provision of law, the department may implement and administer this article by means of provider bulletins, manuals, or other similar instructions, without taking regulatory
 action. The department shall notify the fiscal and appropriate policy committees of the Legislature of its intent to issue a provider bulletin, manual, or other similar instruction, at least five days prior to issuance. In addition, the department shall provide a copy of any provider bulletin, manual, or other similar instruction issued under this paragraph to the fiscal and appropriate policy committees of the Legislature. The department shall consult with interested parties and appropriate stakeholders, regarding the implementation and ongoing administration of this article.

(i) To the extent necessary to implement this article, the department shall submit, by September 30, 2005, to the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services proposed amendments to the Medi-Cal state plan, including, but not limited to, proposals to modify inpatient hospital payments to designated public hospitals, modify the disproportionate share hospital payment
 program, and provide for supplemental Medi-Cal reimbursement for certain physician and nonphysician professional services. The department shall, subsequent to September 30, 2005, submit any additional proposed amendments to the Medi-Cal state plan that may be required by the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, to the extent necessary to implement this article.

(j) Each designated public hospital shall implement a comprehensive process to offer individuals who receive services at the hospital the opportunity to apply for the Medi-Cal program, the Healthy Families Program, or any other public health coverage program for which the individual may be eligible, and shall refer the individual to those programs, as appropriate.

(k) In any judicial challenge of the provisions of this article, nothing shall create an obligation on the part of the state to fund any payment
 from state funds due to the absence or shortfall of federal funding.

(l) Any reference in this article to the “Medicare cost report” shall be deemed a reference to the Medi-Cal cost report to the extent that report is approved by the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services for any of the uses described in this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 86, Sec. 2.   (AB 1066)   Effective July 15, 2011.   Repealed on date prescribed in subd. (b) or (g) or in Section 14166.26.   Note: Termination clauses affect Article 5.2, commencing with Section 14166.)
-------------------------------------------

14166.3.

(a) During the demonstration project and successor demonstration project terms, payment adjustments to disproportionate share hospitals shall not be made pursuant to Section 14105.98. Payment adjustments to disproportionate share hospitals shall be made solely in accordance with this article.

(b) Except as otherwise provided in this
 article, the department shall continue to make all eligibility determinations and perform all payment adjustment amount computations under the disproportionate share hospital payment adjustment program pursuant to Section 14105.98 and pursuant to the disproportionate share hospital provisions of the Medicaid state plan in effect as of the 2004–05 state fiscal year. For purposes of these determinations and computations, services that are rendered under the Health Care Coverage Initiative authorized pursuant to Part 3.5 (commencing with Section 15900) or the Low Income Health Program authorized pursuant to Part 3.6 (commencing with Section 15909) shall be included.

(c) (1) Notwithstanding Section 14105.98, the federal disproportionate share hospital allotment specified for California under Section 1396r-4(f) of Title 42 of the United States Code for each of federal fiscal years 2006 to 2015, inclusive, and federal fiscal
 year 2016 with respect to the pro rata portion of the allotment that will apply during successor demonstration year 10 pursuant to paragraph (2), shall be distributed solely among the following hospitals:

(A) Eligible hospitals, as determined pursuant to Section 14105.98 for each project year and successor demonstration year in which the particular federal fiscal year commences, which meet the definition of a public hospital as specified in paragraph (25) of subdivision (a) of Section 14105.98.

(B) Hospitals that are licensed to the University of California, which meet the requirements set forth in Section 1396r-4(d) of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(2) The federal disproportionate share hospital allotment for each of the federal fiscal years 2006 to 2015, inclusive, shall be aligned with the project year or
 successor demonstration year in which the applicable federal fiscal year commences. The payment adjustment year, as used within the meaning of paragraph (6) of subdivision (a) of Section 14105.98, shall be the corresponding project year or successor demonstration year. With respect to successor demonstration year 10, the period of July 1, 2015, through October 31, 2015, shall be aligned with a pro rata portion of the federal disproportionate share hospital allotment for federal fiscal year 2016.

(3) Uncompensated Medi-Cal and uninsured costs as reported pursuant to Section 14166.8, shall be used by the department as the basis for determining the hospital-specific disproportionate share hospital payment limits required by Section 1396r-4(g) of Title 42 of the United States Code for the hospitals described in paragraph (1).

(4) The distribution of the federal disproportionate share
 hospital allotment to hospitals described in paragraph (1) shall satisfy the state’s payment obligations, if any, with respect to those hospitals under Section 1396r-4 of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(d) Eligible hospitals, as determined pursuant to Section 14105.98 for each project year and each successor demonstration year, which are nonpublic hospitals, nonpublic-converted hospitals, and converted hospitals, as those terms are defined in paragraphs (26), (27), and (28), respectively, of subdivision (a) of Section 14105.98, shall receive Medi-Cal disproportionate share hospital replacement payment adjustments pursuant to Section 14166.11 and other provisions of this chapter. The payment adjustments so provided shall satisfy the state’s payment obligations, if any, with respect to those hospitals under Section 1396r-4 of Title 42 of the United States Code. The federal share of these payments shall not be claimed from the federal
 disproportionate share hospital allotment described in subdivision (c).

(e) The nonfederal share of payments described in subdivisions (c) and (d) shall be derived from the following sources:

(1) With respect to the payments described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) that are made to designated public hospitals, the nonfederal share shall consist of certified public expenditures described in subparagraphs (A) and (C) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 14166.9, and intergovernmental transfer amounts described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 14166.6.

(2) With respect to the payments described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) that are made to nondesignated public hospitals, the nonfederal share shall consist solely of state General Fund appropriations.

(3) With respect to the payments described in subdivision (d), the nonfederal share shall consist of state General Fund appropriations.

(f) (1) During the terms of the demonstration project and successor demonstration project, for the 2005–06 state fiscal year and any subsequent state fiscal years, no public entity shall be obligated to make any intergovernmental transfer pursuant to Section 14163, and all transfer amount determinations for those state fiscal years shall be suspended. However, during the demonstration project and successor demonstration project terms, intergovernmental transfers shall be made with respect to the disproportionate share hospital payment adjustments made in accordance with paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 14166.6, or paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 14166.61, as applicable.

(2) During the terms of the demonstration project and successor demonstration project, for the 2005–06 state fiscal year and any subsequent state fiscal years, transfer amounts from the Medi-Cal Inpatient Payment Adjustment Fund to the Health Care Deposit Fund, as provided for pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 14163, are hereby reduced to zero. Unless otherwise specified in this article, this paragraph shall be disregarded for purposes of the calculations made under Section 14105.98 during the demonstration project and successor demonstration project.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 86, Sec. 3.   (AB 1066)   Effective July 15, 2011.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in Section 14166.26 or in subd. (b) or (g) of Section 14166.2.   Repealed on date prescribed in Section 14166.26 or in subd. (b) or (g) of Section 14166.2.)
-------------------------------------------

14166.35.

(a) For each project year through October 31, 2010, designated public hospitals shall be eligible to receive the following:

(1) Payments for Medi-Cal inpatient hospital services and supplemental payments for physician and nonphysician practitioner services, as specified in Section 14166.4.

(2) Disproportionate share hospital payment adjustments, as specified in Section 14166.6.

(3) Safety net care pool funding, as specified in Section 14166.7.

(4) Stabilization funding, as specified in Section 14166.75.

(5) Grants to distressed hospitals as negotiated by the California Medical Assistance Commission pursuant to Section 14166.23.

(b) For each successor demonstration year, designated public hospitals shall be eligible to receive the following:

(1) Payments for Medi-Cal inpatient hospital services and supplemental payments for physician and nonphysician practitioner services, as specified in Section 14166.4.

(2) Disproportionate share hospital payment adjustments, as specified in Section 14166.61.

(3) Safety net care pool funding, as specified in Section 14166.71.

(4) Delivery system reform incentive pool payments, as specified in Section 14166.77.

(5) Grants to distressed hospitals as negotiated by the California Medical Assistance Commission to the extent the funding is available pursuant to Section 14166.23 or any other provisions of this article.

(c) Payments under this section shall be in addition to other payments that may be made in accordance with law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 86, Sec. 4.   (AB 1066)   Effective July 15, 2011.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in Section 14166.26 or in subd. (b) or (g) of Section 14166.2.   Repealed on date prescribed in Section 14166.26 or in subd. (b) or (g) of Section 14166.2.)
-------------------------------------------

14166.4.

(a) Notwithstanding Article 2.6 (commencing with Section 14081), and any other provision of law, fee-for-service payments to the designated public hospitals for inpatient services to Medi-Cal beneficiaries shall be governed by this section. Each of the designated public hospitals shall receive as payment for inpatient hospital services provided to Medi-Cal beneficiaries during any project year or